Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 9. Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry Act.
§ 9.1-907.
Procedures upon a failure to register, reregister, or verify registration information.

Whenever it appears from the records of the State Police that a person has failed to comply with the duty to register, reregister, or verify his registration information, the State Police shall promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person last registered, reregistered, or verified his registration information or, if the person failed to comply with the duty to register, in the jurisdiction in which the person was last convicted of an offense for which registration or reregistration is required or if the person was convicted of an offense requiring registration outside the Commonwealth, in the jurisdiction in which the person resides. The State Police shall forward to the jurisdiction an affidavit signed by a custodian of the records that such person failed to comply with the duty to register, reregister, or verify his registration information. If such affidavit is admitted into evidence, it shall constitute prima facie evidence of the failure to comply with the duty to register, reregister, or verify his registration information in any trial or hearing for the violation of §

18.2-472.1

, provided that in a trial or hearing other than a preliminary hearing, the requirements of subsection G of §

18.2-472.1

have been satisfied and the accused has not objected to the admission of the affidavit pursuant to subsection H of § 18.2-472.1. The State Police shall also promptly notify the local law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction of the person’s last known residence as shown in the records of the State Police.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a law-enforcement officer employed by a sheriff’s office or police department of a locality from enforcing the provisions of this chapter, including obtaining a warrant, or assisting in obtaining an indictment for a violation of §

18.2-472.1

. The local law-enforcement agency shall notify the State Police forthwith of such actions taken pursuant to this chapter or under the authority granted pursuant to this section.

The State Police shall physically verify or cause to be physically verified the registration information within 30 days of the initial registration and semiannually each year thereafter and within 30 days of a change of address of those persons who are not under the control of the Department of Corrections or community supervision as defined by §

53.1-1

, who are required to register pursuant to this chapter. Whenever it appears that a person has provided false registration information, the State Police shall promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe that a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person last registered, reregistered, or verified his registration information. The State Police shall forward to the jurisdiction an affidavit signed by a custodian of the records that such person failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter. If such affidavit is admitted into evidence, it shall constitute prima facie evidence of the failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter in any trial or hearing for the violation of §

18.2-472.1

, provided that in a trial or hearing other than a preliminary hearing, the requirements of subsection G of §

18.2-472.1

have been satisfied and the accused has not objected to the admission of the affidavit pursuant to subsection H of § 18.2-472.1. The State Police shall also promptly notify the local law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction of the person’s last known residence as shown in the records of the State Police.

The Department of Corrections or community supervision as defined by §

53.1-1

shall physically verify or cause to be physically verified by the State Police the registration information within 30 days of the original registration and semiannually each year thereafter and within 30 days of a change of address of all persons who are under the control of the Department of Corrections or community supervision, and those who are under supervision pursuant to §

37.2-919

, who are required to register pursuant to this chapter. The Department of Corrections or community supervision, upon request, shall provide the State Police the verification information, in an electronic format approved by the State Police, regarding persons under their control who are required to register pursuant to the chapter. Whenever it appears that a person has provided false registration information, the Department of Corrections or community supervision shall promptly notify the State Police, who shall investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe that a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person last registered, reregistered, or verified his registration information. The State Police shall forward to the jurisdiction an affidavit signed by a custodian of the records that such person failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter. If such affidavit is admitted into evidence, it shall constitute prima facie evidence of the failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter in any trial or hearing for the violation of §

18.2-472.1

, provided that in a trial or hearing other than a preliminary hearing, the requirements of subsection G of §

18.2-472.1

have been satisfied and the accused has not objected to the admission of the affidavit pursuant to subsection H of §

18.2-472.1

. The State Police shall also promptly notify the local law-enforcement agency of the jurisdiction of the person’s last known residence as shown in the records of the State Police.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2005, c. 603; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2007, c. 718; 2009, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 1, 4; 2010, c. 858; 2015, cc. 81, 598; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 603 deleted “together with the warrant” preceding “an affidavit signed” in subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “or assist in obtaining an indictment” and added the language beginning “or if the person was convicted” at the end; in subsection B, added the language beginning “including obtaining a warrant” at the end of the first sentence and added the last sentence; and added subsections C and D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 718, in subsection D, in the first sentence, inserted “or Community Supervision as defined by §

53.1-1

” near the beginning and deleted “as defined by §

53.1-1

” preceding “who are required” and inserted “or Community Supervision” following “Corrections” in the second and third sentences.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, effective August 21, 2009, and Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, effective September 15, 2009, are identical, and rewrote the third sentence of subsection A, the fourth sentence of subsection C, and the fifth sentence of subsection D; and substituted “a custodian” for “the custodian” throughout the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 858 inserted “and those who are under supervision pursuant to §

37.2-919

” in the first sentence in subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 81 and 598 are identical, and substituted “community supervision” for “Community Supervision” throughout and inserted “or cause to be physically verified by the State Police” in the first sentence of subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “or” preceding “reregister,” inserted “or verify his registration information,” deleted “or” following “reregistered,” and inserted “or verified his registration information” in subsection A; deleted “or” preceding “reregistered” and inserted “or verified his registration information” following “reregistered” in subsection C; deleted “or” preceding “reregistered” and inserted “or verified his registration information” following “reregistered” in subsection D.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2532. Order of Remand — Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Affidavit violated Confrontation Clause. —

Affidavit filed pursuant to subsection D of §

18.2-472.1

in a failure to register case, which affidavit stated that state police records showed that no sex offender registration or re-registration form was filed for defendant, was accusatory, resembled “ex-parte examination,” was a core testimonial statement, and thus violated the Confrontation Clause. Commonwealth v. Dickens, 72 Va. Cir. 533, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 17 (Norfolk Feb. 20, 2007).

§ 9.1-908.
Duration of registration requirement.

Any person required to register, reregister, or verify his registration information shall be required to register until the duty to register, reregister, or verify his registration information is terminated by a court order as set forth in §

9.1-910

, except that any person who has been convicted of (i) any Tier III offense, (ii) murder or (iii) former §

18.2-67.2:1

shall have a continuing duty to reregister or verify his registration information for life.

Any period of confinement in a federal, state, or local correctional facility, hospital, or any other institution or facility during the otherwise applicable period shall toll the registration or verification period and the duty to reregister or verify his registration information shall be extended. Persons confined in a federal, state, or local correctional facility shall not be required to reregister or verify his registration information until released from custody. Persons civilly committed pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.) of Title 37.2 shall not be required to reregister or verify his registration information until released from custody. Persons confined in a federal, state, or local correctional facility or civilly committed pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.) of Title 37.2 shall notify the Registry within three days following any change of name.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2005, c. 631; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2007, c. 718; 2008, c. 877; 2010, c. 858; 2014, c. 677; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 677, cl. 2 provides: “That any person required to register who has changed his name prior to July 1, 2014, who has not already reregistered following the change of name shall register in person with the local law-enforcement agency within three days of July 1, 2014.”

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 631 inserted “former” preceding “§

18.2-67.2:1

” in the first paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and in the first paragraph, inserted “or for a period of 10 years from the date of his last conviction for a violation of §

18.2-472.1

, whichever is longer” and “murder or (iii)” and made a related change.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 718 substituted “until the duty to register . . . in §

9.1-910

” for “for a period of 10 years from the date of initial registration or for a period of 10 years from the date of his last conviction for a violation of §

18.2-472.1

, whichever is longer” in the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 877 deleted “10-year” following “applicable” in the second paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 858 added the last sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 677 in the second paragraph added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “or” preceding “reregister,” inserted “or verify his registration information,” deleted “and” following “reregistered,” substituted “Tier III” for “sexually violent” in clause (i), and inserted “or verify his registration information” following “reregister” in first paragraph; inserted “or verification” preceding “period” and inserted “or verify his registration information” following “reregister” in second paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Rape and Other Sexual Offenses, § 27.

§ 9.1-909.
Relief from registration, reregistration, or verification.

Upon expiration of three years from the date upon which the duty to register as a Tier III offender or murderer is imposed, the person required to register may petition the court in which he was convicted or, if the conviction occurred outside of the Commonwealth, the circuit court in the jurisdiction where he currently resides, for relief from the requirement to verify his registration information four times each year at three-month intervals. After five years from the date of his last conviction for a violation of §

18.2-472.1

, a Tier III offender or murderer may petition for relief from the requirement to verify his registration information every month. A person who is required to register may similarly petition the circuit court for relief from the requirement to verify his registration twice each year after five years from the date of his last conviction for a violation of §

18.2-472.1

. The court shall hold a hearing on the petition, on notice to the attorney for the Commonwealth, to determine whether the person suffers from a mental abnormality or a personality disorder that makes the person a menace to the health and safety of others or significantly impairs his ability to control his sexual behavior. Prior to the hearing the court shall order a comprehensive assessment of the applicant by a panel of three certified sex offender treatment providers as defined in §

54.1-3600

. A report of the assessment shall be filed with the court prior to the hearing. The costs of the assessment shall be taxed as costs of the proceeding.If, after consideration of the report and such other evidence as may be presented at the hearing, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the person does not suffer from a mental abnormality or a personality disorder that makes the person a menace to the health and safety of others or significantly impairs his ability to control his sexual behavior, the petition shall be granted and the duty to verify his registration information more frequently than once a year shall be terminated. The court shall promptly notify the State Police upon entry of an order granting the petition. The person shall, however, be under a continuing duty to register annually for life. If the petition is denied, the duty to verify his registration information with the same frequency as before shall continue. A denial of a petition shall be appealable pursuant to §

17.1-405

.A petition for relief pursuant to this subsection may not be filed within three years from the date on which any previous petition for such relief was denied.

The duly appointed guardian of a person convicted of an offense requiring registration, reregistration, or verification of his registration information as either a Tier I, Tier II, or Tier III offender or murderer, who due to a physical condition is incapable of (i) reoffending and (ii) reregistering or verifying his registration information, may petition the court in which the person was convicted for relief from the requirement to reregister or verify his registration information. The court shall hold a hearing on the petition, on notice to the attorney for the Commonwealth, to determine whether the person suffers from a physical condition that makes the person (i) no longer a menace to the health and safety of others and (ii) incapable of reregistering or verifying his registration information. Prior to the hearing the court shall order a comprehensive assessment of the applicant by at least two licensed physicians other than the person’s primary care physician. A report of the assessment shall be filed with the court prior to the hearing. The costs of the assessment shall be taxed as costs of the proceeding.If, after consideration of the report and such other evidence as may be presented at the hearing, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that due to his physical condition the person (i) no longer poses a menace to the health and safety of others and (ii) is incapable of reregistering or verifying his registration information, the petition shall be granted and the duty to reregister or verify his registration information shall be terminated. However, for a person whose duty to reregister or verify his registration information was terminated under this subsection, the Department of State Police shall, annually for Tier I or Tier II offenders and quarterly for persons convicted of Tier III offenses and murder, verify and report to the attorney for the Commonwealth in the jurisdiction in which the person resides that the person continues to suffer from the physical condition that resulted in such termination.The court shall promptly notify the State Police upon entry of an order granting the petition to terminate the duty to reregister.If the petition is denied, the duty to reregister shall continue. An appeal from the denial of a petition shall be to the Court of Appeals.A petition for relief pursuant to this subsection may not be filed within three years from the date on which any previous petition for such relief was denied.If, at any time, the person’s physical condition changes so that he is capable of reoffending, reregistering, or verifying his registration information, the attorney for the Commonwealth shall file a petition with the circuit court in the jurisdiction where the person resides and the court shall hold a hearing on the petition, with notice to the person and his guardian, to determine whether the person still suffers from a physical condition that makes the person (i) no longer a menace to the health and safety of others and (ii) incapable of reregistering or verifying his registration information. If the petition is granted, the duty to reregister shall commence from the date of the court’s order. An appeal from the denial or granting of a petition shall be to the Court of Appeals. Prior to the hearing the court shall order a comprehensive assessment of the applicant by at least two licensed physicians other than the person’s primary care physician. A report of the assessment shall be filed with the court prior to the hearing. The costs of the assessment shall be taxed as costs of the proceeding.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2020, c. 829; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, in the first pararaph, inserted “or murderer” and “or, if the conviction occurred outside the Commonwealth, the circuit court in the jurisdiction where he currently resides” in the first sentence, and added the second and third sentences; in the second paragraph, substituted “more frequently than once a year” for “every 90 days” in the first sentence, deleted “and the State Police shall remove Registry information on the offender from the Internet system” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “with the same frequency as before” for “every 90 days” in the third sentence; in subsection B,
inserted “or murderer” in the first sentence of the first paragraph and made a related change, in the last sentence of the second paragraph, inserted “persons convicted of” and substituted “offenses and murder” for “offenders,” and at the end of the third paragraph, deleted “and the State Police shall remove any Registry information on the offender from the Internet system.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 substituted “Tier III” for “sexually violent,” substituted “verify his registration information four times each year at three-month intervals” for “reregister every 90 days,” substituted “verify his registration information every month” for “reregister monthly,” and substituted “verify his registration twice each year” for “reregister every 180 days” in the first paragraph of subsection A; substituted “verify his registration information” for “reregister” in the second paragraph of subsection A; deleted “or” preceding “reregistration,” inserted “or verification of his registration information” following “reregistration,” inserted “Tier I, Tier II, or Tier III” for “sex offender, sexually violent,” inserted “or verifying his registration information” following “reregistering” in clause (ii), and inserted “or verify his registration information” following “reregister” in the first paragraph of subsection B; inserted “or verify his registration information” following “reregister” following “reregister” in clause (ii), substituted “Tier I or Tier II offenders” for “sex offenders,” and substituted “Tier III” for “sexually violent” in the second paragraph of subsection B; deleted “or” preceding “reregistering,” and inserted “or verifying his registration information” following “reregistering.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “A denial of a petition shall be appealable pursuant to §

17.1-405

” for “An appeal from the denial of a petition shall lie to the Supreme Court” in the second paragraph of subsection A; and substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Virginia Supreme Court” twice in subsection B.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law and procedure for the year 2007-2008, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 149 (2008).

§ 9.1-910.
Removal of name and information from Registry.

Any person required to register, other than a person who has been convicted of any (i) Tier III offense, (ii) two or more offenses for which registration is required, (iii) a violation of former §

18.2-67.2:1

, or (iv) murder, may petition the circuit court in which he was convicted or the circuit court in the jurisdiction where he then resides for removal of his name and all identifying information from the Registry. A person who is required to register for a single Tier I offense may petition the court no earlier than 15 years from the later of the date of initial registration or the date of his last conviction for (a) a violation of §

18.2-472.1

or (b) any felony. A person who is required to register for a single Tier II offense may petition the court no earlier than 25 years from the later of the date of initial registration or the date of his last conviction for (1) a violation of §

18.2-472.1

or (2) any felony.

A petition may not be filed until all court ordered treatment, counseling, and restitution has been completed. The court shall obtain a copy of the petitioner’s complete criminal history and registration, reregistration, and verification of registration information history from the Registry and then hold a hearing on the petition at which the applicant and any interested persons may present witnesses and other evidence. The Commonwealth shall be made a party to any action under this section. If, after such hearing, the court is satisfied that such person no longer poses a risk to public safety, the court shall grant the petition. In the event the petition is not granted, the person shall wait at least 24 months from the date of the denial to file a new petition for removal from the Registry.

The State Police shall remove from the Registry the name of any person and all identifying information upon receipt of an order granting a petition pursuant to subsection B.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2005, c. 631; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2007, c. 718; 2008, c. 877; 2018, c. 68; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 631 inserted “former” preceding “§

18.2-67.2:1

” in subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “or” preceding (iii) and inserted “or (iv) murder” in the first sentence, and inserted “nor earlier than 10 years from the date of his last conviction for a violation of §

18.2-472.1

” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 718, in subsection A, in the second sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation and added “or (ii) any felony” at the end, added the present third sentence, inserted “obtain a copy . . . from the Registry and then” in the present fourth sentence and added the present fifth sentence; and deleted “or at the end of the period for which the person is required to register under §

9.1-908

” at the end in subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 877 rewrote the second sentence of subsection A, which read: “A petition may not be filed earlier than 10 years after the date of initial registration nor earlier than 10 years from the date of his last conviction for a violation of §

18.2-472.1

or any felony.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 68 inserted “or of any similar offense under the laws of any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof or the United States or any political subdivision thereof” twice in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 substituted “Tier III” for “sexually violent” in clause (i) of subsection A; inserted “A person who is required to register for a single Tier I offense may Petition” following “Registry,” substituted “the court no” for “may not be filed,” substituted “from the later of” for “or 25 years for violations of §

18.2-64.1

, subsection C of §

18.2-374.1:1

, or subsection C, D, or E of §

18.2-374.3

, or of any similar offense under the laws of any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof or the United States or any political subdivision thereof, after,” substituted “or” for “nor earlier than 15 years, or 25 years for violations of §

18.2-64.1

, subsection C of § §

18.2-374.1:1

, or subsection C, D, or E of §

18.2-374.3

, or of any similar offense under the laws of any foreign country or any political subdivision thereof or the United States or any political subdivision thereof, from,” and added last sentence to subsection A; added subsection B designator; deleted “and” preceding “reregistration,” and inserted “and verification of registration information” following “reregistration” in subsection B; redesignated subsection B as subsection C;
substituted “subsection B” for “subsection A” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 9.1-911.
Registry maintenance.

The Registry shall include conviction data received from the courts, including the disposition records for juveniles tried and convicted in the circuit courts pursuant to § 16.1-269.1, on convictions for offenses for which registration is required and registrations, reregistrations, and verifications of registration information received from persons required to do so. The Registry shall also include a separate indication that a person has been convicted of a Tier III offense. The State Police shall forthwith transmit the appropriate information as required by the Federal Bureau of Investigation for inclusion in the National Sex Offender Registry.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “and” following “registrations,” inserted “and verification of registration information” following “reregistrations,” and substituted “Tier III” for “sexually violent.”

§ 9.1-912.
Registry access and dissemination; fees.

Except as provided in §

9.1-913

and subsection B or C of this section, Registry information shall be disseminated upon request made directly to the State Police or to the State Police through a local law-enforcement agency. Such information may be disclosed to any person requesting information on a specific individual in accordance with subsection B. The State Police shall make Registry information available, upon request, to criminal justice agencies including local law-enforcement agencies through the Virginia Criminal Information Network (VCIN). Registry information provided under this section shall be used for the purposes of the administration of criminal justice, for the screening of current or prospective employees or volunteers or otherwise for the protection of the public in general and children in particular. The Superintendent of State Police may by regulation establish a fee not to exceed $15 for responding to requests for information from the Registry. Any fees collected shall be deposited in a special account to be used to offset the costs of administering the Registry.

Information regarding a specific person shall be disseminated upon receipt of an official request form that may be submitted directly to the State Police or to the State Police through a local law-enforcement agency. The official request form shall include a statement of the reason for the request; the name and address of the person requesting the information; the name, address and, if known, the social security number of the person about whom information is sought; and such other information as the State Police may require to ensure reliable identification.

Registry information regarding all registered offender’s electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information may be electronically transmitted by the Department of State Police to a business or organization that offers electronic communication or remote computing services for the purpose of prescreening users or for comparison with information held by the requesting business or organization. In order to obtain the information from the Department of State Police, the requesting business or organization that offers electronic communication or remote computing services shall agree to notify the Department of State Police forthwith when a comparison indicates that any such registered offender’s electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information is being used on their system. The requesting business or organization shall also agree that the information will not be further disseminated.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2007, cc. 759, 823; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 759 and 823 are identical, and inserted “or C” following “subsection B” in the first sentence of subsection A; and added subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “sex” preceding “offenders” in subsection C.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

No ex post facto violation. —

Based on the nonpunitive nature and purpose under subsection A of §

9.1-912

of the sex offender registry, §

9.1-900

et seq., the requirement that a defendant submit his current registry information to the Virginia State Police was not a violation of the U.S. or Virginia Constitutional prohibition against ex post facto laws under U.S. Const., Art. I, § 10, and Va. Const., Art. 1, § 9. Doe v. Commonwealth, 74 Va. Cir. 75, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 130 (Fairfax County June 7, 2007).

§ 9.1-913.
Public dissemination by means of the Internet.

The State Police shall develop and maintain a system for making certain Registry information on persons convicted of an offense for which registration is required publicly available by means of the Internet. The information to be made available shall include the offender’s name; all aliases that he has used or under which he may have been known; the date and locality of the conviction and a brief description of the offense; his age, current address, and photograph; his current work address; the name of any institution of higher education at which he is currently enrolled; and such other information as the State Police may from time to time determine is necessary to preserve public safety, including but not limited to the fact that an individual is wanted for failing to register, reregister, or verify his registration information. The system shall be secure and not capable of being altered except by the State Police. The system shall be updated each business day with newly received registrations, reregistrations and verifications of registration information. The State Police shall remove all information that it knows to be inaccurate from the Internet system.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2005, c. 603; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2016, c. 335; 2020, c. 829.

Cross references.

As to personal information systems that are exempt from the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act, see §

2.2-3802

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 603 inserted “persons convicted of murder of a minor and” in the first sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and substituted “an offense for which registration is required” for “murder of a minor and violent sex ofenders” in the first sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 335, in the second sentence, inserted “his current work address; the name of any institution of higher education at which he is currently enrolled” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “or” preceding “reregister,” inserted “or verify his registration information” following “reregister,” deleted “and” preceding “registrations,” and inserted “and verifications of registration information” following “reregistrations.”